Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB374.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 317.450 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The board shall issue an apprentice license to practice barbering to any person
who:
1. Is at least seventeen and one-half (17-1/2) years of age;
2. Is of good moral character and temperate habit;
3. Possesses a high school diploma, a High School Equivalency Diploma,
or a transcript from an issuing institution that is recognized by the
educational authority in the state from which the diploma, certificate, or
transcript is issued;
4. Has graduated from a licensed school of barbering;
5. Has satisfactorily passed the apprentice examination prescribed by the
barber board, which shall include a practical assessment of the
applicant's skills, including but not limited to a taper haircut, shampoo,
straight razor facial shave, facial, and a chemical application; and
6. Has paid a fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated
by the board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(b) A barber shall serve an apprentice period of at least six (6) months but not
more than nine (9) months of continuous service from the effective date of the
license issued pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) In addition to the grounds for disciplinary action specified in KRS 317.590,
the board may, during the apprentice period, require a licensee to retake any
part or all of the written or practical examination, or both.
(d) At the end of the apprentice period, the board shall issue a license to practice
barbering to an apprentice licensee who has:
1. Satisfactorily passed the barber examination prescribed by the board by
Page 1 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A;[ and]
2. Submitted satisfactory proof that he or she has successfully completed
up to one (1) hour of online or in-person training provided by a
recognized statewide nonprofit antidomestic violence association. The
training shall be a one (1) time course with a focus on how to
recognize the signs of domestic violence, respond to these signs, and
refer a client to resources for victims of domestic violence; and
(3) Complied with all other requirements of this subsection.
(e) The board may issue a barber license by endorsement to a resident of another
state, district, or territory within the United States of America upon payment
of a fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the board
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, and upon submission of satisfactory
evidence that the requirements for licensure in the other state are substantially
equivalent to the requirements of this state at the time of application. In the
absence of the required equivalency, an applicant from another state, district,
or territory within the United States of America, shall show proof of three (3)
years or more experience immediately before making application and be
currently licensed and in good standing with the state, district, or territory in
which he or she is licensed. The board may also require an applicant under
this section to pass a written and practical examination to establish
equivalency.
(f) The board shall make the domestic violence training required in paragraph
(d) of this subsection available online at no cost to the attendee and shall
collaborate with ZeroV to develop the training materials.
(g) A person licensed under this chapter, and the employer of that licensee, who
responds to signs of domestic violence with a client, refers a client to
Page 2 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
resources for victims of domestic violence, or fails to respond or refer a
client shall not be civilly or criminally liable for his or her actions or
inactions under this paragraph.
(2) The board shall:
(a) Issue a license to operate a barber shop or mobile barber shop to any barber
licensed under the provisions of this chapter upon application and payment of
a fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the board in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A;
(b) Refuse to issue the license upon a failure of the licensed barber to comply
with the provisions of this chapter or the administrative regulations
promulgated by the board;
(c) Allow the licensed owner of a barber shop or mobile barber shop, which is
licensed under this chapter, to rent or lease space in his or her barber shop to
an independent contract owner; and
(d) Allow an unlicensed owner of a barber shop to rent or lease space in his or her
barber shop to an independent contract owner, only if the shop owner has a
licensed barber as a manager of the shop at all times. If the owner, manager,
or location of a barber shop changes, the required form and fee shall be
submitted to the board.
(3) The board shall issue a license to operate a school of barbering to any person, firm,
or corporation who or which:
(a) Applies for a license upon forms furnished by the board;
(b) Has the equipment and facilities that may be required by administrative
regulations promulgated by the board;
(c) Has furnished adequate evidence to the board that:
1. There is an intent to establish a bona fide school for the education and
training of competent barbers; and
Page 3 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
2. A sufficient number of teachers licensed by the board will be employed
to conduct the school, including at least one (1) teacher with a minimum
of twelve (12) months' experience teaching in a barber school that
includes administrative experience; and
(d) Pays a fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the
board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) The board shall issue a student permit to any person enrolled in a licensed barber
school upon payment of a fee as established in administrative regulations
promulgated by the board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(5) The board shall issue a license to teach barbering to any person who:
(a) Is of good moral character and temperate habit;
(b) Possesses a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma;
(c) Has been a Kentucky-licensed and practicing barber for at least eighteen (18)
months;
(d) Has satisfactorily passed the examination prescribed by the board by
promulgation of administrative regulations; and
(e) Has paid a fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the
board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(6) The board shall issue a license to any barber who holds an independent contract
owner's license who:
(a) Is of good moral character and temperate habit;
(b) Possesses a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma;
(c) Is a licensed and practicing barber under this chapter; and
(d) Has paid a fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the
board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(7) The board shall issue a demonstration charity event permit to any licensed barber
who pays a fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the
Page 4 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(8) Applications for examination required in this section shall be accompanied by an
examination fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the
board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(9) (a) On and after July 1, 2016, a license issued pursuant to this section shall expire
on the first day of July next following the date of its issuance. A license shall
be renewed on June 1 through July 1 of each year.
(b) Any license shall automatically be renewed by the board:
1. Upon receipt of the application for renewal or duplicate renewal
application form and the required annual renewal license fee submitted
either in person or via written or electronic means; and
2. If the applicant for renewal is otherwise in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and the administrative regulations of the
board.
(10) The annual renewal license fee for each type of license renewal shall be as
established in administrative regulations promulgated by the board in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A.
(11) (a) The fee per year for the renewal of an expired license, if the period of
expiration does not exceed five (5) years, shall be as established by
administrative regulations promulgated by the board in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A.
(b) An applicant who fails to renew a license within five (5) years of its
expiration shall comply with the requirements for relicensure established by
the board through promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A.
Section 2. KRS 317A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All applicants for licensure under this chapter shall meet the following minimum
Page 5 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
requirements:
(a) Be of good moral character and temperate habit;
(b) Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(c) Have a high school diploma, a High School Equivalency Diploma, or results
from the Test for Adult Basic Education indicating a score equivalent to the
twelfth grade of high school;[ and]
(d) Have submitted the completed application along with the required license fee
as set forth in administrative regulation; and
(e) 1. Have submitted satisfactory proof that the applicant successfully
completed up to one (1) hour of online or in-person training provided
by a recognized statewide nonprofit antidomestic violence association.
2. The one (1) time training shall focus on how to recognize the signs of
domestic violence, respond to these signs, and refer a client to
resources for victims of domestic violence.
3. The board shall make the required domestic violence training
available online at no cost to the attendee and shall collaborate with
ZeroV to develop the training materials.
4. A person licensed under this chapter, and the employer of that
licensee, who responds to signs of domestic violence with a client,
refers a client to resources for victims of domestic violence, or fails to
respond or refer a client shall not be civilly or criminally liable for his
or her actions or inactions under this paragraph under this
paragraph.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the board may refuse to grant a
license to any applicant who fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter or
any administrative regulations promulgated by the board.
(3) The board shall issue a cosmetologist license to any person who:
Page 6 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
(a) Has official certification from the state board or agency that certifies
cosmetology schools that the applicant has graduated from a licensed school
of cosmetology requiring one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours within five
(5) years of enrolling within the school; and
(b) Has satisfactorily passed an examination prescribed by the board to determine
fitness to practice cosmetology.
(4) The board shall issue an esthetician license to any person who:
(a) Has satisfactorily completed seven hundred fifty (750) hours of instruction in
a licensed school approved by the board; and
(b) Has received a satisfactory grade on an examination prescribed by the board
to determine fitness to practice as an esthetician.
(5) The board shall issue a license to act as a nail technician to any person who:
(a) Has official certification from the state board or agency that certifies
cosmetology schools that the applicant has completed satisfactorily a nail
technician course of study of four hundred fifty (450) hours in a licensed
school of cosmetology within five (5) years of submitting an application for
licensure; and
(b) Has satisfactorily passed an examination prescribed by the board to determine
fitness to practice as a nail technician.
(6) The board shall issue a license to operate a salon as follows:
(a) The board shall issue a license to operate a beauty salon to any licensed
cosmetologist. An owner who is not a licensed cosmetologist shall have a
licensed cosmetologist as manager of the beauty salon at all times. If the
owner, manager, or location of a beauty salon changes, the required form and
fee shall be submitted to the board.
(b) The board shall issue a license to operate an esthetic salon to any licensed
esthetician. An owner who is not a licensed esthetician shall have a licensed
Page 7 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
esthetician or cosmetologist as manager of the esthetic salon at all times. If the
owner, manager, or location of an esthetic salon changes, the required form
and fee shall be submitted to the board.
(c) The board shall issue a license to operate a nail salon to any licensed nail
technician. An owner who is not a licensed nail technician shall have a
licensed nail technician or cosmetologist as manager of the nail salon at all
times. If the owner, manager, or location of a nail salon changes, the required
form and fee shall be submitted to the board.
(7) The board shall issue an instructor training certificate to train to be an instructor in
cosmetology, esthetic practices, or nail technology to any person who:
(a) Has held a current cosmetologist, esthetician, or nail technician license for at
least one (1) year; and
(b) Has submitted an application that has been signed by the owners of the school
in which the applicant will study. The course of instruction shall be for a
period of seven hundred fifty (750) hours and not less than four and one-half
(4.5) months at one (1) school providing this instruction. The school owner
shall verify to the board the completion of seven hundred fifty (750) hours.
For out-of-state verification, an applicant shall provide official certification
from the board or agency that certifies schools in that other state of licensure
verifying the applicant has completed a course of instruction consisting of at
least seven hundred fifty (750) hours and not less than four and one-half (4.5)
months at one (1) school providing the instruction.
(8) The board shall issue a license to teach cosmetology to any person who:
(a) Has held a current cosmetologist license and an instructor training certificate
for at least four and one-half (4.5) months; and
(b) Has satisfactorily passed the examination for the teaching of cosmetology as
prescribed by the board.
Page 8 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
(9) The board shall issue a license to teach esthetic practices to any person who:
(a) Has held a current esthetician license and an instructor training certificate for
at least four and one-half (4.5) months;
(b) Has completed fifty (50) hours in esthetics training within the last two (2)
years; and
(c) Has satisfactorily passed the examination for the teaching of esthetic practices
as prescribed by the board.
(10) The board shall issue a license to teach nail technology to any person who:
(a) Has held a current nail technician license and an instructor training certificate
for at least four and one-half (4.5) months;
(b) Has completed fifty (50) hours in nail technology training within the last two
(2) years; and
(c) Has satisfactorily passed the examination for the teaching of nail technology
as prescribed by the board.
(11) (a) If the requirements of KRS 317A.090 have been satisfied, the board shall
issue a license to operate a school of cosmetology or a school of esthetic
practices or a school of nail technology to any person who has as manager at
all times a person who is:
1. Licensed as an instructor;
2. Charged with the responsibility of ensuring that all applicable statutes
and administrative regulations are complied with; and
3. Responsible for having a sufficient number of licensed instructors of
cosmetology or esthetic practices or nail technology to conduct the
school.
(b) Any student enrolling in the school shall pay the fee set forth in administrative
regulation to the board before enrollment in the school shall be allowed.
(c) The transfer of any license to operate a school of cosmetology or esthetic
Page 9 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
practices or nail technology shall require the board's approval and shall
become effective upon submitting the required form and fee to the board.
(12) (a) The board shall issue a license to provide shampoo and style services to any
person who:
1. Has passed an examination prescribed by the board to determine fitness
to perform shampoo and style services;
2. Has completed at least three hundred (300) hours of instruction from a
licensed school of cosmetology; and
3. Has met any other reasonable criteria established in administrative
regulations promulgated by the board.
(b) The board shall issue a license to operate a limited beauty salon to any person:
1. Who is licensed to provide shampoo and style services or who employs
at least one (1) person licensed to provide shampoo and style services at
the limited beauty salon; and
2. Whose limited beauty salon facility complies with standards established
in administrative regulations promulgated by the board.
(13) Licenses established under this chapter shall be valid for a period of time to be
established by the board through the promulgation of administrative regulations.
(14) Licenses and permits issued by the board may be renewed beginning July 1 through
July 31 of each year.
(a) Any license shall automatically be renewed by the board:
1. Upon submission and receipt of the application for renewal and the
required annual license fee; and
2. If the application for renewal is otherwise in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and the administrative regulations of the
board.
(b) Any license application postmarked after July 31 shall be considered expired,
Page 10 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
and the appropriate restoration fee as required by administrative regulation of
the board shall apply.
(15) The requirements for a new license for any person whose license has expired for a
period exceeding five (5) years shall be as follows:
(a) Cosmetologists shall retake and pass both the practical and theory
examination;
(b) Estheticians shall retake and pass both the practical and theory examination;
(c) Instructors of cosmetology or esthetic practices shall retake and pass both the
practical and theory examination;
(d) Nail technicians shall retake and pass the practical and theory examination;
(e) Providers of shampoo and style services shall retake and pass both the
practical and theory examination; and
(f) The appropriate restoration fee as set forth in administrative regulation of the
board shall be required.
(16) Guest artists or demonstrators appearing and demonstrating before persons other
than licensed cosmetologists, estheticians, nail technicians, and providers of
shampoo and style services shall apply for a permit that shall be in effect for ten
(10) days. Guest artists performing before a nonprofit, recognized professional
cosmetologists', estheticians', or cosmetology school or shampoo and style services'
or nail technicians' group shall apply for a permit, but shall not be required to pay
the fee.
(17) The board shall issue a permit for threading and may promulgate administrative
regulations that set out requirements for the practice of threading. Threading shall
be conducted in a licensed beauty salon or a facility with a permit to engage in
threading, and the board may promulgate administrative regulations for facilities
and the required sanitation standards. The permit shall be valid for a period of one
(1) year.
Page 11 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
(18) The board shall issue a permit for eyelash artistry and may promulgate
administrative regulations that set out the requirements for the practice of eyelash
artistry. Eyelash artistry shall be conducted in a licensed beauty salon or a facility
with a permit to engage in eyelash artistry, and the board may promulgate
administrative regulations for facilities, education, and the required sanitation
standards. The permit shall be valid for a period of one (1) year.
(19) The board shall issue a permit for makeup artistry and may promulgate
administrative regulations that set out requirements for the practice of makeup
artistry and required sanitation standards. The permit shall be valid for a period of
one (1) year.
(20) (a) The board may issue a permit for temporary event services to a Kentucky-
licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, limited stylist, or nail technician and shall
promulgate administrative regulations that set out requirements for issuance
of a temporary event services permit including:
1. Sanitation standards;
2. Criteria for events that qualify;
3. Application requirements and fees; and
4. Any other requirements necessary to protect the public health and
safety.
(b) The temporary event services permit shall be valid only for the specific dates
and locations requested.
(c) No person other than a Kentucky-licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, limited
stylist, or nail technician shall perform services at a temporary event services
location, and no licensee shall perform services other than those authorized by
his or her respective license pursuant to KRS 317A.020.
(d) The Kentucky-licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, limited stylist, or nail
technician holding a temporary event services permit shall be liable for any
Page 12 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 909
violation of KRS Chapter 317A or administrative regulations promulgated
under KRS Chapter 317A that occurs at the temporary event services location.
Page 13 of 13
BR090900.100 - 909 - XXXX 1/23/2026 8:33 AM Jacketed